Colorado, session 2026A, HB1187.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-33.5-1209, amend
(2) as follows:
24-33.5-1209. Repeal of sections.
(2) Sections 24-33.5-1204.5, 24-33.5-1206.1, 24-33.5-1206.2,
24-33.5-1206.3, 24-33.5-1206.4, 24-33.5-1206.5, 24-33.5-1206.6, and
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

24-33.5-1207.6, concerning programs for fire suppression administered by
the division of fire prevention and control, and this section are repealed,
effective September 1, 2026 SEPTEMBER 1, 2037. Before the repeal, the
programs administered pursuant to those sections are scheduled for review
in accordance with section 24-34-104.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-34-104, repeal
(27)(a)(XIII); and add (38)(a)(III) as follows:
24-34-104. General assembly review of regulatory agencies and
functions for repeal, continuation, or reestablishment - legislative
declaration - repeal.
(27) (a) The following agencies, functions, or both, are scheduled
for repeal on September 1, 2026:
(XIII) The fire suppression programs of the division of fire
prevention and control created in sections 24-33.5-1204.5, 24-33.5-1206.1,
24-33.5-1206.2, 24-33.5-1206.3, 24-33.5-1206.4, 24-33.5-1206.5,
24-33.5-1206.6, and 24-33.5-1207.6;
(38) (a) The following agencies, functions, or both, are scheduled
for repeal on September 1, 2037:
(III) THE FIRE SUPPRESSION PROGRAMS OF THE DIVISION OF FIRE
PREVENTION AND CONTROL CREATED IN SECTIONS 24-33.5-1204.5,
24-33.5-1206.1, 24-33.5-1206.2, 24-33.5-1206.3, 24-33.5-1206.4,
24-33.5-1206.5, 24-33.5-1206.6, AND 24-33.5-1207.6.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-33.5-1206.2, amend
(2)(a) as follows:
24-33.5-1206.2. Job registration and plan review.
(2) (a) Any working plans and hydraulic calculations submitted for
review by the administrator or by a certified local fire suppression inspector
pursuant to subparagraph (II) of paragraph (b) of subsection (1) SUBSECTION
(1)(b)(II) of this section must bear the signature and certification number of
either a licensed professional engineer or a level three or higher engineering
technician (fire suppression engineering technology - automatic sprinkler
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1187

design or fire suppression engineering technology - special hazards system
layout), whichever is relevant to the particular job or design, certified by the
national institute for the certification of engineering technologists. Such
licensed professional engineer or engineering technician shall certify that
he or she has THEY HAVE reviewed the plan and design and finds FIND that
it meets the applicable standards adopted by the administrator for fire safety
and that it is adequately designed to meet the system requirements.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-33.5-1206.4, amend
(2)(c) and (3)(c)(II) as follows:
24-33.5-1206.4. System approval, inspection, and inspectors.
(2) (c) The administrator or his THE ADMINISTRATOR'S agent shall be
available to provide such fire safety inspections to any county, municipality,
or special district on a contractual or job-by-job basis. The county,
municipality, or special district shall pay the actual costs of such inspections
by the administrator or his THE ADMINISTRATOR'S agents.
(3) Every inspection of a fire suppression system conducted
pursuant to this part 12 shall be by a person certified as having met the
inspection training requirements set by the administrator. Such person shall:
(c) (II) Have demonstrated to the administrator that the applicant has
met such other equivalent qualifications, including but not limited to
education and experience, as may be prescribed by rule and regulation. If
the head of a county, municipality, or special district that has fire
suppression system enforcement responsibility determines that the applicant
has met the qualifications adopted pursuant to this subparagraph (II)
SUBSECTION (3)(c)(II), then he THEY shall notify the administrator, who
shall certify the applicant; or
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-33.5-1206.6, amend
(2)(d), (4), and (5)(a) as follows:
24-33.5-1206.6. Unlawful acts - civil penalties - disciplinary
actions.
(2) In addition to the penalties provided in subsection (1) of this
section, the administrator may withhold, deny, suspend, or revoke the
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1187

registration or certification of any registered fire suppression contractor or
certified fire safety inspector or applicant therefor if the administrator finds,
upon proof, that any such person has committed any of the following:
(d) Performing any services in a negligent manner or permitting any
of his THEIR agents or employees to perform services in a grossly negligent
manner, regardless of whether actual damage or damages to the public is
established;
(4) A person acting as a fire suppression contractor may not bring
any legal action to collect compensation due for performing any act for
which registration is required pursuant to section 24-33.5-1206.1 unless
such contractor alleges and proves that he was THEY WERE duly registered
under said section at the time the alleged cause of action arose.
(5) (a) Any person who provides testimony with respect to a
disciplinary matter and any person who lodges a complaint pursuant to this
section shall be IS immune from liability in any civil action brought against
such person for acts occurring while acting in his or her THEIR capacity as
a witness or complainant.
SECTION 6. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1187

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1187